Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be

codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma

Workers' Compensation Act of 2025".

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.


60-1-12104 TKR 12/31/24






Req. No. 12104 Page 1